Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.017

Display of national league of families' POW/MIA flag.

(1) Each public entity must display the national league of families' POW/MIA flag along with the flag of the United States and the flag of the state upon or near the principal building of the public entity on the following days: (a) Former Prisoners of War Recognition Day on April 9th; (b) Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day on March 30; (c) Armed Forces Day on the third Saturday in May; (d) Memorial Day on the last Monday in May; (e) Flag Day on June 14; (f) Independence Day on July 4; (g) National Korean War Veterans Armistice Day on July 27; (h) National POW/MIA Recognition Day on the third Friday in September; (i) Veterans Day on November 11th; and (j) Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day on December 7th. If the designated day falls on a Saturday or Sunday, then the POW/MIA flag must be displayed on the preceding Friday.

(2) The governor's veterans affairs advisory committee must provide information to public entities regarding the purchase and display of the POW/MIA flag upon request.

(3) As used in this section, "public entity" means every state agency, including each institution of higher education, and every county, city, and town.

[ 2017 c 79 s 1; 2013 c 5 s 2; 2012 c 11 s 2; 2002 c 293 s 1.]